Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.001, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Board of Barber Examiners. (a) A Board of Barber Examiners is established to consist of four barber members and one public member, as defined in section 214.02, appointed by the governor. (b) The barber members shall be persons who have practiced as registered barbers in this state for at least five years immediately prior to their appointment; shall be graduates from the 12th grade of a high school or have equivalent education, and shall have knowledge of the matters to be taught in registered barber schools, as set forth in section 154.07. deleted text begin One of the barber members shall be a member of, or recommended by, a union of journeymen barbers that has existed at least two years, and one barber member shall be a member of, or recommended by, a professional organization of barbers.deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.003, is amended to read: 154.003 FEES. (a) The fees collected, as required in this chapter, chapter 214, and the rules of the board, shall be paid to the board. The board shall deposit the fees in the general fund in the state treasury. (b) The board shall charge the following fees: (1) new text begin practical new text end examination deleted text begin and certificatedeleted text end , registered barber, deleted text begin $85deleted text end new text begin $40new text end ; new text begin (2) initial barber registration, $45; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end retake of written examination, $10; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end examination and certificate, instructor, $180; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end certificate, instructor, $65; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end temporary teacher permit, $80; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end temporary registered barber, military, $85; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end temporary barber instructor, military, $180; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end renewal of registration, registered barber, $80; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end renewal of registration, instructor, $80; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end renewal of temporary teacher permit, $65; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end student permit, $45; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end renewal of student permit, $25; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end initial shop registration, $85; new text begin (15) initial mobile barber shop registration, $150; new text end deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (16)new text end initial school registration, $1,030; deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (17)new text end renewal shop registration, $85; deleted text begin (16)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end renewal school registration, $280; new text begin (19) renewal mobile barber shop registration, $100; new text end deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (20)new text end restoration of registered barber registration, $95; deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (21)new text end restoration of shop registration, $105; deleted text begin (19)deleted text end new text begin (22)new text end change of ownership or location, $55; new text begin (23) restoration of mobile barber shop registration, $120; new text end deleted text begin (20)deleted text end new text begin (24)new text end duplicate registration, $40; deleted text begin (21)deleted text end new text begin (25)new text end home study course, $75; deleted text begin (22)deleted text end new text begin (26)new text end letter of registration verification, $25; and deleted text begin (23)deleted text end new text begin (27)new text end reinspection, $100. new text begin (c) If the board uses a board-approved examination provider for the entire comprehensive examination or for a portion of the comprehensive examination, any fees required by that approved examination provider must be paid directly to the approved examination provider by the examinee and is not included and is separate from any required fees paid by the examinee to the board. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.01, is amended to read: 154.01 REGISTRATION MANDATORY. (a) The registration of the practice of barbering serves the public health and safety of the people of the state of Minnesota by ensuring that individuals seeking to practice the profession of barbering are appropriately trained in the use of the chemicals, tools, and implements of barbering and demonstrate the skills necessary to conduct barber services in a safe, sanitary, and appropriate environment required for infection control. (b) No person shall practice, offer to practice, or attempt to practice barbering without a current certificate of registration as a registered barber, issued pursuant to provisions of deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. (c) A registered barber must only provide barbering services in a registered barber shop deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end barber school, new text begin or mobile barber shop new text end unless prior authorization is given by the board. (d) No person shall operate a barber shop unless it is at all times under the direct supervision and management of a registered barber and the owner or operator of the barber shop possesses a current shop registration card, issued to the barber shop establishment addressdeleted text begin , under sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. (e) No person shall serve, offer to serve, or attempt to serve as an instructor of barbering without a current certificate of registration as a registered instructor of barbering or a temporary permit as an instructor of barbering, as provided for the board by rule, issued deleted text begin under sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. Barber instruction must be provided in registered barber schools only. (f) No person shall operate a barber school unless the owner or operator possesses a current certificate of registration as a barber school, issued deleted text begin under sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end by the Board of Barber Examiners. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. What constitutes barbering. Any one or any combination of the following practices when done upon the head, face, and neck for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when done for payment directly or indirectly or without payment for the public generally constitutes the practice of barbering within the meaning of deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end : to shave the face or necknew text begin using a straight razor or other toolnew text end , trim the beard, clean, condition, cut, color, shape, or straighten the hair of any person of either sex for compensation or other reward received by the person performing such service or any other person; to give facial and scalp massage with oils, creams, lotions, or other preparations either by hand or mechanical appliances; to singe, shampoo the hair, or apply hair tonics; or to apply cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays, or lotions to hair, scalp, face, or neck.new text begin The removal of hair through the process of waxing is not barbering.new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Certificate of registration. A "certificate of registration" means the certificate issued to an individual, barber shop, deleted text begin ordeleted text end barber schoolnew text begin , or mobile barber shopnew text end that is in compliance with deleted text begin the requirements of sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Designated registered barber. The "designated registered barber" is a registered barber designated as the manager of a barber shopnew text begin or a mobile barber shopnew text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Mobile barber shop. new text end new text begin A "mobile barber shop" means a barber shop that is operated in a mobile vehicle or a mobile structure for the exclusive use of practicing barbering services performed by a registered barber in compliance with this chapter. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Straight razor. new text end new text begin A razor with a rigid steel cutting blade or a replaceable blade that is hinged to a case that forms a handle when the razor is open for use. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Waxing. new text end new text begin The process of removing hair from a part of the body by applying wax and peeling off the wax. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.05, is amended to read: 154.05 WHO MAY RECEIVE CERTIFICATES OF REGISTRATION AS A REGISTERED BARBER. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end A person is qualified to receive a certificate of registration as a registered barber if the person: (1) deleted text begin has successfully completed ten grades of educationdeleted text end new text begin is at least 17 years of agenew text end ; (2) has successfully completed 1,500 hours of study in a board-approved barber school; and (3) has passed deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a comprehensivenew text end examination deleted text begin conducted by the boarddeleted text end new text begin in accordance with section 154.09new text end to determine new text begin the person's new text end fitness to practice barbering. deleted text begin (b) A first-time applicant for a certificate of registration to practice as a registered barber who fails to pass the comprehensive examination conducted by the board and who fails to pass a onetime retake of the written examination, shall complete an additional 500 hours of barber education before being eligible to retake the comprehensive examination as many times as necessary to pass. deleted text end Sec. 11. new text begin [154.052] MOBILE BARBER SHOPS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Registration. new text end new text begin (a) No person shall operate a mobile barber shop unless: new text end new text begin (1) at all times, the mobile barber shop is under the direct supervision and management of a registered barber; and new text end new text begin (2) the owner or operator of the mobile barber shop possesses a current mobile barber shop registration that was issued by the Board of Barber Examiners. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Services and location reporting requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile barber shop is limited to providing only hair cutting and straight razor shave services. new text end new text begin (b) A mobile barber shop is subject to the barber shop requirements in this chapter and Minnesota Rules, except when this chapter or the rule conflicts with specific mobile barber shop requirements. Any reference to a barber shop in this chapter and in Minnesota Rules includes mobile barber shops, except when this chapter or the rule conflicts with specific mobile barber shop requirements. new text end new text begin (c) A mobile barber shop registration holder must: new text end new text begin (1) maintain a permanent address for receiving correspondence and service of process and provide an address where the mobile barber shop is kept when the mobile barber shop is not in service; new text end new text begin (2) visibly display the name of the mobile barber shop and the mobile barber shop's registration number as shown on the registration certificate on at least one exterior side of the mobile barber shop; new text end new text begin (3) supply to the board the make, model, and vehicle identification and license plate number of any vehicle or mobile structure used as a mobile barber shop. Each mobile barber shop registration is valid for only one specific mobile vehicle or mobile structure; new text end new text begin (4) have a functioning phone available at all times; new text end new text begin (5) submit to the board, on or before the first day of each month, the mobile barber shop's schedule of locations and times of operation during the month. The mobile barber shop registration holder must report any proposed changes to the schedule to the board via e-mail at the beginning of the week during which the changes will occur; and new text end new text begin (6) comply with the requirements of all federal, state, and local laws, rules, and ordinances. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Water and wastewater requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile barber shop must have self-contained water holding tanks with gauges that indicate the levels in the tanks and reserve capabilities. The water supply tanks must be integrated and plumbed into the wastewater tanks or gray water tanks. new text end new text begin (b) A mobile barber shop must have a potable water capacity of not less than 20 gallons and a designated hose that the mobile barber shop only uses to fill the potable water tank. new text end new text begin (c) A mobile barber shop must have available hot water in a capacity of not less than five gallons or hot water on demand. new text end new text begin (d) A mobile barber shop must have a wastewater tank or gray water tank capacity that is 15 percent larger than the water supply holding tank. new text end new text begin (e) A mobile barber shop must not operate when: new text end new text begin (1) the available potable water supply is insufficient to comply with the infection control requirements in this chapter and Minnesota Rules; or new text end new text begin (2) a tank for wastewater, black water, or gray water is at 90 percent or greater capacity. new text end new text begin (f) A mobile barber shop must have a restroom in operating condition inside of the mobile barber shop that includes: new text end new text begin (1) an installed hand sink with potable water; new text end new text begin (2) soap; new text end new text begin (3) single-use towels; and new text end new text begin (4) a self-contained recirculating flush toilet with a holding tank or a properly maintained composting toilet. new text end new text begin (g) A mobile barber shop must discharge wastewater into a sanitary sewage system or a sanitary dumping station. When disposing of sewage and wastewater, a mobile barber shop must comply with all federal, state, and local environmental and sanitary regulations. new text end new text begin (h) In addition to the sink required in the restroom, the mobile barber shop must have at least one sink with hot and cold running water accessible to persons in the area where the mobile barber shop provides services. Sinks must be permanently installed and connected to the vehicle's or mobile structure's potable water supply and wastewater tanks. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Electrical and power requirements. new text end new text begin (a) If power for heating, air conditioning, and other equipment is supplied by a generator, the generator must be properly vented outside and all doors and windows must be closed when the generator is operating to avoid exhaust entering the mobile barber shop. The generator must comply with all applicable municipal noise ordinances. new text end new text begin (b) Liquefied petroleum gas systems installed in the mobile barber shop must comply with the current edition of the National Fire Protection Association Standard No. 58 LP-Gas Code as adopted under the State Fire Code. Use of portable heating units is prohibited. new text end new text begin (c) All heating and cooling systems must be factory installed and meet all state and federal regulations for mobile vehicle or mobile structure heating and cooling. new text end new text begin (d) The mobile barber shop must have working alarms for carbon monoxide, smoke, and combustible gas, either as single alarms or a combined alarm. new text end new text begin (e) All electrical wiring must comply with the State Electrical Code. Electrical equipment plugged into outlets must be UL-listed and must comply with state and local fire codes. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Safety, inspection, and infection control requirements. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the safety and infection control requirements for barber shops in this chapter and Minnesota Rules, mobile barber shops must comply with the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) the mobile barber shop must not provide services unless the mobile barber shop is parked with the engine off, stable, and leveled. The mobile barber shop must use stabilizing jacks when it is recommended by the manufacturer's instructions for the vehicle or mobile structure. The mobile barber shop must use at least two wheel chocks when the mobile barber shop is operating; new text end new text begin (2) the mobile barber shop must provide all services inside of the vehicle or mobile structure; new text end new text begin (3) all hazardous substances in the mobile barber shop must be stored upright in secured cabinets when the mobile barber shop is moving; new text end new text begin (4) the mobile barber shop must have a ventilation system that is sufficient to provide fresh air in the mobile barber shop; and new text end new text begin (5) all moving parts, including slide outs, disability ramps, and steps must be in good working order. new text end new text begin (b) Any duly authorized employee of the Board of Barber Examiners shall have authority to enter and inspect a mobile barber shop during normal business hours. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Compliance with local government law. new text end new text begin The mobile barber shop must comply with all city, township, and county ordinances regarding wastewater disposal, commercial motor vehicles, vehicle insurance, noise, signage, parking, commerce, business, and other local government requirements. The mobile barber shop owner must be informed about the requirements that apply to the mobile barber shop in each jurisdiction where the mobile barber shop operates, and must ensure that the mobile barber shop complies with those requirements. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Admission requirements; course of instruction. No barber school shall be approved by the board unless deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the barber schoolnew text end requires, deleted text begin as a prerequisite to admission, ten grades of an approved school or its equivalent, as determined by educational transcript, high school diploma, high school equivalency certificate, or an examination conducted by the commissioner of education, which shall issue a certificate that the student has passed the required examination, and unless it requires,deleted text end as a prerequisite to graduation, a course of instruction of at least 1,500 hours of not more than ten hours of schooling in any one working day. The course of instruction must include the following subjects: scientific fundamentals for barbering; hygiene; practical study of the hair, skin, muscles, and nerves; structure of the head, face, and neck; elementary chemistry relating to sanitation; disinfection; sterilization and antiseptics; diseases of the skin, hair, and glands; massaging and manipulating the muscles of the face and neck; haircutting; shaving; trimming the beard; bleaching, tinting and dyeing the hair; and the chemical waving and straightening of hair. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.08, is amended to read: 154.08 APPLICATION; FEE. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application and fee requirements. new text end Each applicant for an examination shall: (1) make new text begin an new text end application to the Board of Barber Examiners new text begin or a board-approved examination provider new text end on blank forms prepared and furnished by deleted text begin it, the application todeleted text end new text begin the board or the provider. The application mustnew text end contain proof under the applicant's oath of the particular qualifications and identity of the applicant; (2) provide all documentation required in support of the application; (3) pay to the board the required fee; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) upon acceptance of the notarized applicationnew text begin ,new text end present a corresponding government-issued photo identification when the applicant appears for new text begin the new text end examinationdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) file an application with the board no later than the twentieth day of the month preceding the month when the practical portion of the exam is administered. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.09, is amended to read: 154.09 EXAMINATIONS, CONDUCT AND SCOPE. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Examination dates. new text end The board new text begin or a board-approved examination provider new text end shall conduct new text begin practical new text end examinations of applicants for certificates of registration to practice as registered barbers not deleted text begin more than sixdeleted text end new text begin less than fournew text end times each year, at such time and place as the board may determine. deleted text begin Additionaldeleted text end Written examinations may be scheduled deleted text begin by the boarddeleted text end and conducted by board staff new text begin or a board-approved provider new text end as designated by the board. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Documentation required. new text end The deleted text begin proprietordeleted text end new text begin owner or operatornew text end of a barber school must file an affidavit with the board of hours completed by students applying to take the deleted text begin registered barberdeleted text end new text begin comprehensivenew text end examination. Students must complete the full 1,500-hour curriculum in a barber school approved by the board deleted text begin within the past four yearsdeleted text end to be eligible for examination. deleted text begin Barber students who have completed barber school more than four years prior to application, that have not obtained a barber registration, license, or certificate in any jurisdiction must complete an additional 500 hours of barber school education to be eligible for the registered barber examination.deleted text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Examinations for registration restoration. new text end deleted text begin Registered barbers that faildeleted text end new text begin An individual who failsnew text end to renew deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin the individual's barbernew text end registration for four or more years deleted text begin aredeleted text end new text begin isnew text end required to new text begin purchase and complete the "Home Study Course for Barbers" program that was prepared and approved by the board before the individual is eligible to new text end take the deleted text begin registered barberdeleted text end new text begin comprehensivenew text end examination to reinstate the new text begin individual's new text end registration. new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Examinations for individuals seeking reciprocity. new text end new text begin An individual who must pass the comprehensive examination under section 154.11 must purchase and complete the "Home Study Course for Barbers" program that was prepared and approved by the board before the individual is eligible to take the comprehensive examination. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contents of examination. new text end The new text begin comprehensive new text end examination deleted text begin of applicants for certificates of registration as barbersdeleted text end shall includenew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a practical deleted text begin demonstrationdeleted text end new text begin portion that consists of: a haircut, and three of the following practical services that the board shall determine: shave, beard trim, shampoo, perm wrap, facial, or color application;new text end and new text begin (2)new text end a written deleted text begin test. The examination must coverdeleted text end new text begin portion that coversnew text end the subjects taught in barber schools deleted text begin registered with the board, includingdeleted text end new text begin as required by this chapter,new text end applicable state deleted text begin statutedeleted text end new text begin statutes,new text end and deleted text begin ruledeleted text end new text begin rulesnew text end . new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Examination grading. new text end new text begin The comprehensive examination must be graded as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the grading for the practical portion of the examination must be on a scale of one to 100, with 100 representing a perfect score. A score of 75 must be the minimum passing grade for the haircut portion and 75 must be the minimum passing score for the average of the remaining parts of the practical examination; and new text end new text begin (2) the grading criteria for the written portion of the examination and the passing grade must be established by the board or a board-approved examination provider for each written examination at the time of the examination's preparation. The lowest passing grade established must not be less than 55. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Failure of examination. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who does not pass one portion of the comprehensive examination within a year of passing the other portion of the comprehensive examination must retake the entire comprehensive examination. new text end new text begin (b) An individual who has failed a portion of the comprehensive examination may retake that portion of the examination within a year of passing the other portion after meeting the requirements of this chapter, paying any required fees and making an application to the board as required by section 154.08. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Examination of nonresidents. (a) A person who meets all of the requirements for barber registration in deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end and either has a currently active license, certificate of registration, or equivalent as a practicing barber or instructor of barbering as verified from another state or, if presenting foreign country credentials as verified by a board-approved professional credential evaluation provider, which in the discretion of the board has substantially the same requirements for registering barbers and instructors of barbering as required deleted text begin by sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin in this chapternew text end shall, upon payment of the required fee, be issued a certificate of registration without examination. (b) Individuals without a current documented license, certificate of registration, or equivalent, as verified in paragraph (a), must have a minimum of 1,500 hours of barber education as verified by the barber school attended in the other state or if presenting foreign country education as verified by a board-approved professional credential evaluation provider, completed within the previous four years, which, in the discretion of the board, has substantially the same requirements as required in deleted text begin sections 154.001, 154.002, 154.003, 154.01 to 154.162, 154.19 to 154.21, and 154.24 to 154.28deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end will be eligible for examination. (c) Individuals unable to meet the requirements in paragraph (a) or (b) shall be subject to all the requirements of section 154.05. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 154.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Examination of cosmetologists. new text end new text begin (a) A person may be credited with up to 1,000 hours of study, which in the discretion of the board has curriculum requirements that are equivalent to the requirements in section 154.07 toward the 1,500 hours of study required under section 154.05 if the person: new text end new text begin (1) has a currently active license as a practicing cosmetologist and the license is verified by the issuing state; new text end new text begin (2) has a certificate of registration or equivalent as a practicing cosmetologist and the certificate is verified by the issuing state; or new text end new text begin (3) has credentials as a practicing cosmetologist from a foreign country that are verified by a board-approved professional credential evaluation provider and the board has determined that the foreign country's curriculum requirements are substantially similar to the requirements in section 154.07. new text end new text begin (b) After a person with credited hours under paragraph (a) completes the remaining required hours in a board-approved barber school and meets the requirement of section 154.05, paragraph (a), clause (1), the person is eligible for examination. new text end